Utah statutes.
76-10-1216.   Distribution of motion picture films -- Definitions.
As used in this act:
(1)  "Exhibit" means to show in a public place or in a place where the public
is admitted, whether or not an admission fee is charged.
(2)  "Distributor" means any person from which a film is acquired by sale,
lease, loan, or any other means, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of
exhibiting it in this state or elsewhere but shall not include any person
whose function with respect to any film is limited to the transportation or
storage thereof.
(3)  "Film" means what is usually known as a motion picture film and which is
intended to be shown commercially for profit by devices of any kind
whatsoever.
(4)  "Person" includes a natural person, firm, association, partnership, or
corporation.
(5)  "Public place" includes any place to which admission is gained by payment
of a membership or admission fee, however designated, notwithstanding it is
designated as a private club or by words of like import.
